New York, session 2025-2026, A6882.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (d) of subdivision 2 of section 2852 of the 2 education law, as amended by section 4-a of part A of chapter 56 of the 3 laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (d) in a school district where the total enrollment of resident 5 students attending charter schools in the base year is greater than five 6 percent of the total public school enrollment of the school district in 7 the base year (i) granting the application would have a significant 8 educational benefit to the students expected to attend the proposed 9 charter school [or] and (ii) the school district or in a city having a 10 population of one million or more inhabitants, the community school 11 district in which the charter school will be located consents to such 12 application; and 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01377-01-5